New York, session 2025-2026, S3630.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The commissioner of the division of criminal justice 2 services is authorized and directed to study the effectiveness and accu- 3 racy of devices used to estimate blood alcohol content by law enforce- 4 ment agencies. Such study shall include, but not be limited to: 5 (a) which devices are used by law enforcement agencies; 6 (b) the accuracy of devices used by law enforcement agencies; 7 (c) the margin of error for devices which are used by law enforcement 8 agencies; 9 (d) the likelihood of an inaccurate reading; and 10 (e) any other related information that such commissioner may deem 11 necessary or relevant in carrying out this study. 12 § 2. The commissioner of the division of criminal justice services 13 shall make a report to the governor and the legislature of their find- 14 ings, conclusions and recommendations no later than one year after the 15 effective date of this act and shall submit with this report such legis- 16 lative proposals as it deems necessary to implement its recommendations. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04266-01-5